Washington statutes.
RCW 39.44.130

Treasurers as registration officers—Fiscal agent.

(1) The duties prescribed in this chapter as to the registration of bonds of any city or town shall be performed by the treasurer thereof, and as to those of any county, port or school district by the county treasurer of the county in which such port or school district lies; but any treasurer as defined in RCW 39.46.020 may designate its legally designated fiscal agency or agencies for the performance of such duties, after making arrangements with such fiscal agency therefor, which arrangements may include provision for the payment by the bond owner of a fee for each registration.

(2) The county treasurer as ex officio treasurer of a special district shall act as fiscal agent or may appoint the fiscal agent to be used by the county.

[ 1995 c 38 s 5; 1994 c 301 s 9; 1985 c 84 s 2; 1983 c 167 s 110; 1971 ex.s. c 79 s 1; 1915 c 91 s 3; RRS s 5496.]

NOTES:

Acts of municipal officers ratified and confirmed—1995 c 38: See note following RCW 3.02.045.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Fiscal agencies: Chapter 43.80 RCW.